Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Plaques on Public Buildings

§ 29-5-151.
Plaque on building paid for with public funds to acknowledge contribution of taxpayers.

Whenever a sign or plaque is to be placed upon a building or other facility or structure, which is constructed and located in the state and paid for wholly or partially by funds of the state or any political subdivision thereof, upon completion of the construction of the building to commemorate or honor the architects, contractors and builders of the building and/or any of the governing authorities in office at that time, the persons responsible for designing and constructing the sign or plaque shall have placed upon it, above the names of anyone else and in prominent lettering which is the same size or larger than any other lettering on the sign or plaque, the words “This Building (or Facility or Structure) Was Paid For By The Taxpayers of_______________ ” (indicating the State of Mississippi and/or any other political subdivision or subdivisions thereof which funded the construction of the building).

This section shall apply only to buildings or other facilities or structures, the construction of which is completed on or after July 1, 1980.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 370, eff from and after July 1, 1980.